Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.221

Grade A raw milk—Cooling.

Milk and milk products for consumption in the raw state or for pasteurization shall be cooled within two hours of completion of milking to forty degrees Fahrenheit or less and maintained at that temperature until picked up, in accordance with RCW 15.36.201, so long as the blend temperature after the first and following milkings does not exceed fifty degrees Fahrenheit.

[ 1995 c 374 s 4; 1984 c 226 s 5; 1961 c 11 s 15.36.260. Prior: 1955 c 238 s 37; prior: 1949 c 168 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6266-36, part. Formerly RCW 15.36.260.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.